csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiiwa',nibaasiiwan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiiwan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [nibaasii,nibaasiin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: ninibaasiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: ginibaasiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nibaasiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninibaanaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginibaamwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginibaanaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nibaabanii',nibaabaniin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaabaniig
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaabaniin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: ninibaaminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: ginibaaminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nibaamwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninibaasiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginibaasiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiibanii',nibaasiibaniin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiibaniig
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiibaniin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiiban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: ninibaasiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: ginibaasiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nibaasiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninibaanaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginibaamwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginibaanaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nibaadogena',nibaadogenan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaadogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaadogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: ninibaaminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: ginibaaminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nibaamwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninibaasiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginibaasiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiidogena',nibaasiidogenan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiidogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiidogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiidog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: ninibaasiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: ginibaasiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nibaasiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaagwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaagoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niwebinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwebinigem
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giwebinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [webinigewa',webinigewan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigewag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigewan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webinige
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niwebinigemin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giwebinigemin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: webinigem
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niwebinigesii,niwebinigesiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giwebinigesii,giwebinigesiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiiwa',webinigesiiwan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiiwan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [webinigesii,webinigesiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: webinigesiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwebinigenaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwebinigemwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwebinigenaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [webinigebanii',webinigebaniin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigebaniig
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigebaniin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigeban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niwebinigeminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giwebinigeminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: webinigemwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwebinigesiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwebinigesiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiibanii',webinigesiibaniin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiibaniig
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiibaniin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiiban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: webinigesiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwebinigenaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwebinigemwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwebinigenaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [webinigedogena',webinigedogenan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigedogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigedogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigedog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niwebinigeminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giwebinigeminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: webinigemwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwebinigesiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwebinigesiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiidogena',webinigesiidogenan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiidogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiidogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiidog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: webinigesiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigegwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigegoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: maajiibatooyaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: maajiibatooyeg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: maajiibatooyan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaad
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatood
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: maajiibatooyaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: maajiibatooyang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoong
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiweg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosigwaa
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiwaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiwang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoosing
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatooyaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatooyegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatooyamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaapan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoopan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: maajiibatooyaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: maajiibatooyangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoongiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiwegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiwaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiwangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoosingiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoowaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoowegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoowanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: maajiibatoowaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: maajiibatoowangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoowiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoosiiwiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoowaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoowegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoowambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonigobanen
